Illinois, session 104th, SB1424.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1049.2 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1049.2)7    Sec. 5-1049.2. Lease of county property. 8    (a) The county board may lease real estate acquired or 9held by the county for any term not exceeding 99 years and may 10lease the real estate when, in the opinion of the county board, 11the real estate is no longer necessary, appropriate, required 12for the use of, profitable to, or for the best interests of the 13county. The authority to lease shall be exercised by an 14ordinance passed by three-fourths of the full county board 15then holding office, at any regular meeting or at any special 16meeting called for that purpose.17    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), upon three-fourths 18vote, by the full county board, the county board may lease 19farmland acquired or held by the county for any term not 20exceeding 5 years. Farmland may be leased to either public or 21private entities via a cash lease, crop-sharing arrangement, 22or custom farming arrangement. The bid process for a lease 23entered into under this subsection must be publicly advertised   SB1424 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09945 RTM 20015 b1and sealed bids must be opened at a county board meeting for 2public review. Counties shall not acquire farmland for the 3sole purpose of entering into a cash lease, crop-sharing 4arrangement, or custom farming arrangement or other 5speculative purpose.6    (c) A county with a population of between 500,000 and 7600,000 inhabitants may lease vacant real estate, structures, 8or facilities that are owned by the county if doing so promotes 9economic development, job creation, or community 10revitalization and does not interfere with existing public 11services. This subsection does not authorize the lease to the 12public of properties, structures, or facilities currently used 13for government-operated services. A lease is not permitted 14under this subsection if the lease may result in the 15elimination or privatization of existing government-operated 16services. The authority to enter into a lease shall be 17exercised by an ordinance passed by three-fourths of the full 18county board then holding office, at any regular meeting or at 19any special meeting called for that purpose. The term of a 20lease entered into under this subsection may not exceed 99 21years. The provisions of this subsection shall become 22inoperative 5 years after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.24(Source: P.A. 103-415, eff. 8-4-23.)